Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB384.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 177.320 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Twenty-two and two-tenths percent (22.2%) of all funds arising from the imposition
of taxes provided by KRS 138.220(1) and (2), 138.660(1) and (2), and 234.320
shall be set aside for the construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of secondary
and rural roads and for no other purpose, and shall be expended for said purposes
by the Transportation Cabinet of the Commonwealth of Kentucky according to the
terms and conditions prescribed in KRS 177.330 to 177.360.
(2) (a) In any fiscal year in which the amount of funds available for revenue
sharing arising from the imposition of taxes provided by KRS 138.220(1)
and (2), 138.660(1) and (2), and 234.320 is less than or equal to seven
hundred seventy-five million dollars ($775,000,000)[On or after July 1,
1980], eighteen and three-tenths percent (18.3%) of those[all] funds[ arising
from the imposition of taxes provided by KRS 138.220(1) and (2), 138.660(1)
and (2), and 234.320] shall be set aside for the construction, reconstruction,
and maintenance of county roads and bridges provided by KRS 179.410 and
179.415.
(b) In any fiscal year in which the amount of funds available for revenue
sharing arising from the imposition of taxes provided by KRS 138.220(1)
and (2), 138.660(1) and (2), and 234.320 is greater than seven hundred
seventy-five million dollars ($775,000,000), the following amounts shall be
set aside for the construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of county
roads and bridges provided by KRS 179.410 and 179.415:
1. One hundred forty-one million eight hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars ($141,825,000); and
2. Thirteen percent (13%) of those funds in excess of seven hundred
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 11/21/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 989
seventy-five million dollars ($775,000,000).
(3) All funds set aside in subsection (2) of this section for the construction,
reconstruction, and maintenance of county roads and bridges shall be allocated to
the county in accordance with the formula established in KRS 177.360(1) pursuant
to KRS 179.410.
(4) [On or after July 1, 1986, ]One-tenth of one percent (0.1%) of all funds arising from
the imposition of taxes provided by KRS 138.220(1) and (2), 138.660, and 234.320
shall be set aside for the purposes and functions of the Kentucky Transportation
Center as established by KRS 177.375 to 177.380, except that the receipts provided
to the center by this subsection shall not exceed one hundred ninety thousand
dollars ($190,000) for any fiscal year.
Section 2. KRS 177.365 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Construction," "reconstruction," and "maintenance" mean the
supervising, inspecting, actual building, and all expenses incidental to the
construction, reconstruction, or maintenance of an urban road or street,
including:
1. Planning, locating, surveying, and mapping or preparing roadway
plans;
2. Acquisition of rights-of-way;
3. Relocation of utilities;
4. Lighting;
5. Elimination of hazards such as roadway grade crossings; and
6. All other items defined in any design, operations, and construction
manuals published by the Department of Highways;
(b) "Street" means any public way which has been designated by an
incorporated city as being a city street and lying within the boundaries of an
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 11/21/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 989
incorporated city; and
(c) "Urban road" means any public way lying within the limits of an
unincorporated urban place as defined in KRS 81.015, and as described by
the United States Bureau of the Census tracts.
(2) (a) In any fiscal year in which the amount of funds available for revenue
sharing arising from the imposition of taxes provided by KRS 138.220(1)
and (2), 138.660(1) and (2), and 234.320 is less than or equal to seven
hundred seventy-five million dollars ($775,000,000)[On and after July 1,
1980], seven and seven-tenths percent (7.7%) of those funds[all amounts
received from the imposition of the taxes provided for in KRS 138.220(1) and
(2), 138.660(1) and (2) and 234.320] shall be set aside by the Finance and
Administration Cabinet for the construction, reconstruction, and maintenance
of urban roads and streets and for no other purpose.
(b) In any fiscal year in which the amount of funds available for revenue
sharing arising from the imposition of taxes provided by KRS 138.220(1)
and (2), 138.660(1) and (2), and 234.320 is greater than seven hundred
seventy-five million dollars ($775,000,000), the following amounts shall be
set aside by the Finance and Administration Cabinet for the construction,
reconstruction, and maintenance of urban roads and streets and for no
other purpose:
1. Fifty-nine million six hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($59,675,000); and
2. Thirteen percent (13%) of those funds in excess of seven hundred
seventy-five million dollars ($775,000,000)[
(2) As used in this section unless the context requires otherwise "construction,"
"reconstruction," and "maintenance" mean the supervising, inspecting, actual
building, and all expenses incidental to the construction, reconstruction, or
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 11/21/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 989
maintenance of a road or street, including planning, locating, surveying, and
mapping or preparing roadway plans, acquisition of rights-of-way, relocation of
utilities, lighting and the elimination of other hazards such as roadway grade
crossings, and all other items defined in the Department of Highways, design,
operations, and construction manuals.
(3) "Urban roads" mean all public ways lying within the limits of the unincorporated
urban place as defined in KRS 81.015, and as described by the Bureau of Census
tracts.
(4) "Streets" mean all public ways which have been designated by the incorporated city
as being city streets and said streets lying within the boundaries of an incorporated
city].
Section 3. KRS 178.010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Construction" includes reconstruction and improvement;
(b) "County road":
1. Means a["County roads" are] public road[roads] which has[have] been
formally accepted by the fiscal court of the county as a part of the
county road system, or a private road[roads], street[streets], or
highway[highways] which has[have] been acquired by the county
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section or KRS 178.405 to 178.425;
and[. "County roads" ]
2. Includes necessary bridges, culverts, sluices, drains, ditches, waterways,
embankments or retaining walls; and
(c) "Hard surface road" means a road the surface of which is asphalt, brick, stone
block, macadam, concrete, gravel or other material of equal merit.
(2) [Nothing in ]This chapter shall not be construed to take from the jurisdiction or
control of the legislative body of any incorporated city any road, bridge, landing or
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 11/21/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 989
wharf, or any other thing exclusively under the jurisdiction or control of the city.
(3) [Nothing in ]This chapter shall not prevent any fiscal court from acquiring
unimproved land by gift for public purposes. However, on and after July 13, 2004, a
fiscal court may only accept a private road, street, or highway by gift if the private
road, street, or highway has been constructed to meet minimum construction
standards established by the fiscal court.
(4) [Nothing in ]This chapter, and[including] the fact that a municipal street has not
been accepted into the county road system, shall not prevent any county from
entering into an agreement, pursuant to the provisions of KRS 65.210 to 65.300,
with any city located within the county to perform work upon or to provide
personnel, materials or equipment for work to be performed upon any street located
within the city. A county may pay one hundred percent (100%), or a lesser
percentage, of all or any part of the cost of the joint undertaking, based upon the
terms agreed to in the interlocal cooperative agreement required by this subsection.
Section 4. KRS 189.503 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "County road"["County roads"] has the same meaning as in KRS
178.010[(1)(b)];
(b) "Local government" means any city, county, urban-county government,
consolidated local government, charter county government, or unified local
government of the Commonwealth;
(c) "Participant" means any person who drives or maintains a motor vehicle used
in a racing event;
(d) "Racing event" means a motor vehicle race which is sanctioned by a
nationally or internationally recognized racing organization and includes
preparations, practices, and qualifications for the race; and
(e) "Street"["Streets"] has the same meaning as in KRS 177.365[(4)].
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 11/21/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 989
(2) A local government may provide permits to allow a racing event within its
jurisdiction:
(a) On county roads;
(b) On streets;
(c) On state-maintained highways in accordance with subsection (7) of this
section; or
(d) At airports, subject to approval from the relevant airport board.
(3) A local government may charge an applicant for a permit under this section:
(a) An application fee not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000); and
(b) The cost of any expenses incurred by the local government to facilitate the
racing event.
(4) A local government that issues a permit for a racing event shall ensure the applicant
for the permit has:
(a) Adequate insurance to pay any damages incurred because of loss or injury to
any person or property;
(b) Adequate security, emergency services, and necessary facilities provided
during the racing event; and
(c) The ability to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of the local
government, the race participants, and those attending the racing event.
(5) For the facilitation of a racing event sanctioned under this section, a local
government may:
(a) Temporarily close roads, streets, highways, alleys, sidewalks, and airport
runways;
(b) Reroute pedestrian and motor vehicle traffic; and
(c) Waive local ordinances and traffic regulations.
(6) No less than sixty (60) days prior to a scheduled racing event, a local government
shall provide written notice to the Transportation Cabinet of any racing event
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 11/21/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 989
permit issued under this section. The written notice shall include:
(a) The time, date, and location of the racing event;
(b) The nationally or internationally recognized racing organization sponsoring
the event;
(c) A road closure plan that specifies the streets, roads, highways, alleys,
sidewalks, and airport runways that will be temporarily closed or obstructed
during the racing event;
(d) A traffic control plan that specifies the on-site traffic controls and detour
routes to be used during the racing event;
(e) The names and phone numbers of emergency and law enforcement contacts
overseeing the racing event; and
(f) If applicable, a request to cross or use a portion of a state-maintained highway
as part of the route in accordance with subsection (7) of this section.
(7) The route of a racing event under this section that uses or crosses any state-
maintained highway shall be subject to prior approval by the Transportation
Cabinet.
(8) So long as the participants adhere to all requirements and regulations set forth by
the nationally or internationally recognized racing organization sponsoring the
racing event, participants in a racing event under this section shall be exempt from
all vehicle equipment and operation standards of this chapter.
Section 5. KRS 176.241 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 176.241 to 176.249:
(1) "County population ranking" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.21-015;
(2) "County road"["County roads"] has the same meaning as in KRS 178.010;
(3) "Local Assistance Road Program" or "LARP" means a list of rehabilitation projects
on county roads, streets, and urban roads identified by the General Assembly for
funding grants; and
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 11/21/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 989
(4) "Street"["Streets"] and "urban road"["urban roads"] have the same meaning as in
KRS 177.365.
Section 6. KRS 179.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1)[ "County roads" are as defined in KRS 178.010.
(2)] "County engineer" means county road engineer;
(2) "County road" has the same meaning as in Section 3 of this Act; and[. ]
(3) "Obstructions" includes any object which prevents the easy, safe and convenient
use of a county road for public travel.
Section 7. Whereas this Act establishes a budgetary change that needs to be in
place at the beginning of the fiscal year, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act
takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise
becoming a law.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 11/21/2025 4:00 PM Jacketed